Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0975.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406mm. (1) The director shall contract with the exchange established by the Michigan health insurance exchange act to certify qualified health plans and qualified dental plans. (2) The director shall by rule establish criteria for certifying qualified health plans and qualified dental plans under federal law. (3) This section does not limit the authority of the director to regulate the business of insurance within this state or to exempt qualified health plans and qualified dental plans from compliance with all applicable provisions of federal or state law. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Qualified dental plan" means that term as defined in section 103 of the Michigan health insurance exchange act. (b) "Qualified health plan" means that term as defined in section 1261. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 973 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.